Louisiana, session 2026, SB283.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 33:9038.31(2) and (3) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
33:9038.82 and 9038.83 are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§9038.31. Definitions
As used in this Part, the following terms shall have the following meanings,
unless the context requires otherwise:
* * *
(2) "Issuer" means the local governmental subdivision, economic
Page 1 of 19
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 283 ENROLLED
development district, industrial development board of the municipality or parish
authorized and created pursuant to Chapter 7 of Title 51 of the Louisiana Revised
Statutes of 1950, a public trust with the municipality or parish as the beneficiary
thereof as provided in Chapter 2-A of Code Title II of Code Book III of Title 9 of the
Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950, as authorized in this Part, the Walnut Street
Special District, the BLVD at Harding Area Special District, any Tax Increment
Development Corporation activated in a municipality with a population of not less
than three thousand three hundred and not more than three thousand three hundred
ninety-five persons according to the most recent federal decennial census for the
purposes provided for in R.S. 33:9038.68, or any district created pursuant to R.S.
33:9038.70 or 9038.77.
(3) "Local governmental subdivision" means any municipality or parish or
any municipality, parish, local industrial board, a local public trust authorized
pursuant to R.S. 33:9038.33(N) or 9038.34(N) having jurisdiction over the
geographical area bounded by the Mississippi River, the Orleans/Jefferson parish
line and the Orleans/Plaquemines parish line, the Walnut Street Special District, the
BLVD at Harding Area Special District, any Tax Increment Development
Corporation activated in a municipality with a population of not less than three
thousand three hundred and not more than three thousand three hundred ninety-five
persons according to the most recent federal decennial census for the purposes
provided for in R.S. 33:9038.68, or any district created pursuant to R.S. 33:9038.70
or 9038.77; but the provisions of this Part shall not apply to any of the financing of
construction, renovations, or improvements of any convention center, hotel complex,
and ancillary facilities within the city of Shreveport. However, the provisions of this
Part shall apply to the parish of Rapides, only as provided in R.S. 33:9038.41.
* * *
§9038.82. BLVD at Harding Area Special District
A. Creation. The BLVD at Harding Area Special District, a special
district and political subdivision of the state, hereinafter referred to as the
"district", is hereby created in the city of Baton Rouge.
Page 2 of 19
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 283 ENROLLED
B. Boundaries. The district shall be comprised of the following parcels
or tracts of land:
PARCEL 1:
A certain 8.14 acre lot or parcel of ground, together with all buildings and
improvements thereon, situated in that part of the city of Baton Rouge known
as Tract F-1-A-1-A-1-A.
PARCEL 2:
A certain 2.703 acre lot or parcel of ground, together with all buildings and
improvements thereon, situated in that part of the city of Baton Rouge known
as Tract A-1-A-1-A-1.
PARCEL 3:
A certain 12.59 acre lot or parcel of ground, together with all buildings and
improvements thereon, situated in that part of the city of Baton Rouge known
as TRACT H-1-A-1-B-1-A-1.
PARCEL 4:
A certain 5.09 acre lot or parcel of ground, together with all buildings and
improvements thereon, situated in that part of the city of Baton Rouge known
as TRACT H-1-A-1-B-1-A-2.
PARCEL 5:
A certain 47.4 acre lot or parcel of ground, together with all buildings and
improvements thereon, situated in that part of the city of Baton Rouge known
as Tract B-1 in Sections 37 & 96, T6S, R1E, fronting on the south side of 72nd
Ave., the north side of Airline Hwy., the north side of Monte Sano.
C. Purpose. The district is created to provide for cooperative economic
development between the district, the city of Baton Rouge, and the owner or
owners of businesses and other property within the district in order to provide
for costs related to infrastructure within the district as determined by the board
of commissioners of the district.
D. Governance. (1) In order to provide for the orderly development of
the district and effectuation of the purposes of the district, the district shall be
Page 3 of 19
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 283 ENROLLED
administered and governed by a board of commissioners as follows:
(a) The mayor of the city of Baton Rouge, or his designee.
(b) The member of the Louisiana House of Representatives whose
district encompasses all or the greater portion of the area of the district shall
appoint two persons.
(c) The member of the Louisiana Senate whose district encompasses all
or the greater portion of the area of the district shall appoint two persons.
(d) The member of the Baton Rouge Metropolitan Council whose district
encompasses all or the greater portion of the area of the district shall appoint
one person.
(e) Any person who is an owner of property within the district, or an
authorized representative of an entity which is an owner of property within the
district, if such person or authorized representative applies to the board for
membership on the board, or that person's or representative's designee.
(2) A majority of the members of the board shall constitute a quorum for
the transaction of business. The board shall keep minutes of all meetings and
shall make them available for inspection through the board's secretary. The
minute books and archives of the district shall be maintained by the board's
secretary. The monies, funds, and accounts of the district shall be in the official
custody of the board.
(3) The board shall adopt bylaws and prescribe rules to govern its
meetings. The members of the board shall serve without salary or per diem and
shall be entitled to reimbursement for reasonable, actual, and necessary
expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.
(4) The domicile of the board shall be established by the board at a
location within the city of Baton Rouge.
(5) The board shall elect from its own members a president and
secretary, whose duties shall be common to such offices or as may be provided
by bylaws adopted by the district. The board shall hold regular meetings and
may hold special meetings as provided in the bylaws. All such meetings shall be
Page 4 of 19
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 283 ENROLLED
public meetings subject to the provisions of R.S. 42:11 et seq.
E. Rights and powers. In addition to the taxing, tax increment finance,
and bonding authority provided for in Subsection F of this Section, the district,
acting by and through its board of commissioners, shall have and exercise all
powers of a political subdivision and a special district necessary or convenient
for the carrying out of its objects and purposes including but not limited to the
following:
(1) To sue and to be sued.
(2) To adopt bylaws and rules and regulations.
(3) To receive by gift, grant, or donation any sum of money, property, aid
or assistance from the United States, the state of Louisiana, or any political
subdivision thereof, or any person, firm, or corporation.
(4) For the public purposes of the district to enter into contracts,
agreements or cooperative endeavors with the state and its political subdivisions
or political corporations and with any public or private association,
corporation, business entity, or individual.
(5) Appoint officers, agents, and employees, prescribe their duties, and
fix their compensation.
(6) To acquire by gift, grant, purchase, or lease such property as may be
necessary or desirable for carrying out the objectives and purposes of the
district and to mortgage and sell such property.
(7) In its own name and on its own behalf to incur debt and to issue
bonds, notes, certificates, and other evidences of indebtedness. For this purpose
the district shall be deemed and considered to be an issuer for purposes of R.S.
33:9037 and shall, to the extent not in conflict with this Section, be subject to the
provisions of R.S. 33:9037.
(8) Establish such funds or accounts as are necessary for the conduct of
the affairs of the district.
(9) To do all things reasonably necessary to accomplish the purposes of
this Section.
Page 5 of 19
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 283 ENROLLED
(10) To designate by ordinance any territory within the district as a
subdistrict in which shall be exercised, to the exclusion of the remainder of the
district, any authority provided to the district by Subsection F of this Section or
any other provision of this Section or other law.
F. Taxing, tax incremental financing, and bonding authority. (1) To
provide for the costs of a project to fund infrastructure within the district, the
district shall have such tax increment finance authority, taxing authority, and
other authority that is provided to local governmental subdivisions in Part II of
Chapter 27 of Title 33 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950, including but
not limited to: ad valorem tax increment financing and bonding in R.S.
33:9038.33; sales tax increment financing and bonding in R.S. 33:9038.34;
cooperative endeavor authority in R.S. 33:9038.35; bond authority in R.S.
33:9038.38; and ad valorem, sales tax, and hotel occupancy tax authority in R.S.
33:9038.39. The project to fund infrastructure within the district is hereby
deemed to be an "economic development project" within the meaning provided
for in that Part.
(2) Notwithstanding any provision of Part II of Chapter 27 of Title 33 of
the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950 or any other law to the contrary, any
powers, authorities, or duties granted under such laws may be restricted to a
subdistrict, the territory of which shall be established by ordinance of the board
of commissioners of the district.
G. Project financing. The district may pledge any taxes collected under
the authority of this Section to any economic development project in
furtherance of the purposes of the district. Such financing may include but shall
not be limited to loans, mortgages, the issuance of bonds, or the issuance of
certificates of indebtedness.
H. Term. The district shall dissolve and cease to exist one year after the
date all bonds, notes, and other evidences of indebtedness of the district,
including refunding bonds are paid in full as to both principal and interest;
however, under no event shall the district have an existence of less than three
Page 6 of 19
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 283 ENROLLED
years.
I. Liberal Construction. This Section, being necessary for the welfare of
the city of Baton Rouge and its residents, shall be liberally construed to effect
the purposes thereof.
§9038.83. Baton Rouge Community College Economic Development District
A. There is hereby created in the parish of East Baton Rouge, in which
Baton Rouge Community College, referred to in this Section as "the college",
is located, the Baton Rouge Community College Economic Development
District, referred to in this Section as "BRCC EDD". The purpose of the BRCC
EDD is to provide for cooperative economic and community development
among the district, the college, the local governmental subdivision, the state,
and the owners of property in the district. As used in this Section, the terms
"college economic development district" or "district" refer to the BRCC EDD
created pursuant to this Section. The college economic development district is
a political subdivision of the state having all of the rights, powers, privileges,
and immunities in accordance with the laws of this state and the Constitution
of Louisiana, subject to the limitations provided in this Section.
B.(1) Boundaries for the Baton Rouge Community College Economic
Development District. The BRCC EDD generally encompasses an area within
the city of Baton Rouge and the parish of East Baton Rouge, Louisiana
generally bounded to the north by the south Right-of-Way of Florida
Boulevard, to the east by the Fairfax Heights Subdivision, to the south by
Government Street Corridor EDD (EBR Ordinance 45531) and to the west by
Wards Creek subject to, and less and except, the exclusions as defined in the
("district exclusions"), and being more fully described as follows:
Commence at the point of intersection of the south Right-of-Way of Florida
Boulevard and west boundary of Lot 43-B of Hickey Town subdivision located
in Section 81, Township 7 South, Range 1 East, Greensburg Land District,
Louisiana;
Thence easterly along said Right-of-Way of Florida Boulevard to the
Page 7 of 19
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 283 ENROLLED
intersection of the east Right-of-Way of Community College Drive being
common with the westerly boundary of Lot A-2-A-1 of the Stephen B. Jones, Et
Al Tract "A" located in Section 82, Township 7 South, Range 1 East,
Greensburg Land District, Louisiana;
Thence southerly along said Right-of-Way of Community College Drive to
intersection of the south boundary of said Lot A-2-A-1;
Thence easterly and northerly along the south and east boundaries of said Lot
A-2-A-1 to the intersection of the south Right-of-Way of Florida Boulevard;
Thence easterly along said Right-of-Way of Florida Boulevard to the
intersection of the east boundary of Tract 3C of the Stephen B. Jones, Et Al
Tract "A" located in Section 82, Township 7 South, Range 1 East, Greensburg
Land District, Louisiana;
Thence southerly along the east boundaries of Tracts 3C, 3B, 3A and 2 of the
Stephen B. Jones, Et Al Tract "A" located in Section 82, Township 7 South,
Range 1 East, Greensburg Land District, Louisiana to the intersection of the
south boundary of said Tract 2 of the Stephen B. Jones, Et Al Tract "A";
Thence westerly along said boundary of Tract 2 of the Stephen B. Jones, Et Al
Tract "A" to the intersection of the east Right-of-Way of Community College
Drive;
Thence southerly along said Right-of-Way of Community College Drive to
intersection of the north boundary of Tract B-V-A2-B of the Stephen B. Jones,
Et Al Tract "B" located in Section 82, Township 7 South, Range 1 East,
Greensburg Land District, Louisiana;
Thence easterly, southerly and westerly along the north, east and south
boundaries of said Tract B-V-A2-B of the Stephen B. Jones, Et Al Tract "B" to
the intersection of east Right-of-Way of Community College Drive;
Thence southerly along said Right-of-Way of Community College Drive
approximately 558 feet to a point;
Thence turning approximately 88 degrees to the right and continue westerly
across Community College Drive to the intersection of the east boundary of Lot
Page 8 of 19
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 283 ENROLLED
D-1-A of the J. D. Garig Tract located in Section 82, Township 7 South, Range
1 East, Greensburg Land District, Louisiana;
Thence continue westerly along said boundary of Lot D-1-A to the intersection
of the east boundary of a 0.625 Acre Tract of the J. D. Garig Tract located in
Section 82, Township 7 South, Range 1 East, Greensburg Land District,
Louisiana;
Thence northerly along said boundary of 0.625 Acre Tract to the intersection
of the north boundary of Lot said 0.625 Acre Lot;
Thence westerly along the north boundaries of 0.625 Acre Tract, 0.833 Acre
Tract, and Lot 10-A of the J. D. Garig and Lots 9-A, 7-A, 6, 5, 4 and 1 of Square
2 of Piper Place, all being located in Section 82, Township 7 South, Range 1
East, Greensburg Land District, Louisiana to the intersection of the east
Right-of-Way of South Foster Drive;
Thence southerly along said Right-of-Way of South Foster Drive to the
intersection of the north Right-of-Way of Garig Avenue;
Thence easterly along said Right-of-Way of Garig Street to the intersection of
the east boundary of Lot 9-A of Square 2 of Piper Place;
Thence turning approximately 90 degrees to the right and continue southerly
across Garig Street to the intersection of the north boundary of Tract 8-A-1 of
Square 1 of Piper Place located in Section 82, Township 7 South, Range 1 East,
Greensburg Land District, Louisiana;
Thence continue southerly along the east boundary of said Lot 8-A-1
approximately 160 feet to a point being the southwest corner of Lot 11 of
Square 1 of Piper Place located in Section 82, Township 7 South, Range 1 East,
Greensburg Land District, Louisiana;
Thence turning approximately 90 degrees to the right and continue westerly
across said Lot 8-A-1 approximately 200 feet to a point being the southeast
corner of Lot 17 of Square 1 of Piper Place, located in Section 82, Township 7
South, Range 1 East, Greensburg Land District, Louisiana;
Thence continue westerly along the south boundaries of Lots 17 and 21 of
Page 9 of 19
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 283 ENROLLED
Square 1 of Piper Place, located in Section 82, Township 7 South, Range 1 East,
Greensburg Land District, Louisiana to the intersection of the east
Right-of-Way of South Foster Drive;
Thence turning approximately 19 degrees to the left and continue westerly
across South Foster Drive to the intersection of the west Right-of-Way of South
Foster;
Thence continue northly along said Right-of-Way of South Foster to the
intersection of the south boundary of Lot A-2 of the former Second
Presbyterian Church Property located in Section 82, Township 7 South, Range
1 East, Greensburg Land District, Louisiana;
The westerly and northerly along the south and west boundaries of said Lot A-2
the former Second Presbyterian Church Property to the intersection of the
south boundary of Lot A being a subdivision of 6.63 acre tract of the Piper
Estate located in Section 82, Township 7 South, Range 1 East, Greensburg Land
District, Louisiana;
Thence westerly along said boundary of Lot A to the intersection of the east
boundary of Tract X-3 of the Millard Byrd Property located in Section 81,
Township 7 South, Range 1 East, Greensburg Land District, Louisiana;
Thence southerly along the east boundaries of said Tract X-3 and Lot B-2-4 of
the Baton Rouge Water Works Co Property located in Section 81, Township 7
South, Range 1 East, Greensburg Land District, Louisiana approximately 591
feet to a point being along the east servitude line of 75 foot wide Wards Creek
servitude within said Lot B-2-4;
Thence northerly along said Wards Creek servitude line through said Lot B-2-4
and Tract X-2 of the Millard Byrd Property located in Section 81, Township 7
South, Range 1 East, Greensburg Land District, Louisiana to the intersection
of the south Right-of-Way of North Boulevard;
Thence continue northerly across North Boulevard and along the west
boundaries of Square 40 and Lot 43-B of Hickey Town located in Section 81,
Township 7 South, Range 1 East, Greensburg Land District, Louisiana to the
Page 10 of 19
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 283 ENROLLED
intersection of the south Right-of-Way of Florida Boulevard, all being common
with the east servitude line of Wards Creek and being the point of beginning.
(2) District exclusions. The following areas shall be excluded from the
BRCC EDD:
Area 1 (Hickey Town Sq 40 & 41)Lot A-1 of a Resubdivision of Square 40 and
Square 41 1 of Hickey Town located in Section 81, Township 7 South, Range 1
East, Greensburg Land District, Louisiana.
Area 2 (Convention Oaks)Lots 1 through 13 of Convention Oaks located in
Section 82, Township 7 South, Range 1 East, Greensburg Land District,
Louisiana.
Area 3 (Pecan Alley)Lot B being a subdivision of 6.63 acre tract of the Piper
Estate and units A-1, A-2, A-3, B-1, B-2, B-3, C-1, C-2, D-1, D-2, E-1, E-2, E-3,
F-1, F-2, F-3, G-1, G-2, G-3, H-1, H-2, I-1, I-2, J-1, J-2, J-3, J-4, J-5, K-1, K-2,
L-1, L-2, M-1, M-2, N-1, N-2, N-3, N-4, N-5 of Pecan Alley located in Section 82,
Township 7 South, Range 1 East, Greensburg Land District, Louisiana.
(3)(a)General residential property exclusion. Notwithstanding anything
in this above property description to the contrary, whether specifically
identified or not, no portion of the BRCC EDD shall include any tract of land
that is used for residential purposes, except for hotels, motels, inns, or bed and
breakfasts for temporary occupancy, in any form or fashion, including, without
limitation, private or public homes, residences, housing, dwellings, apartments,
studios, flats, townhomes, condominiums, cooperatives, residential rooms,
residential beds, dormitories, student residences and housing, student
apartments, fraternity houses, sorority houses, student residential quarters, or
other form of housing, as of the effective date of this Act individually and
collectively "residential properties". All residential properties are deemed
district exclusions. In the event that the description of the BRCC EDD set forth
above includes any of the district exclusions, such district exclusion shall not be
considered as a component of the BRCC EDD.
(b) Whether specifically identified or not, no portion of the BRCC EDD
Page 11 of 19
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 283 ENROLLED
shall include the district exclusions which include any tract of land that is used
for residential purposes, except for hotels, motels, inns, or bed and breakfasts
for temporary occupancy, in any form or fashion, including, without limitation,
private or public homes, residences, housing, dwellings, apartments, studios,
flats, townhomes, condominiums, cooperatives, residential rooms, residential
beds, dormitories, student residences and housing, student apartments,
fraternity houses, sorority houses, student residential quarters, or other form
of housing, as of June 30, 2026, individually and collectively "residential
properties". All residential properties are deemed district exclusions. In the
event that the description of the BRCC EDD set forth in Subsection (B)(1) of
this Section includes any of the district exclusions, the BRCC EDD exclusion
shall not be considered as a component of the BRCC EDD.
(4) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in the property
descriptions provided in this Section, whether specifically identified or not, no
portion of the BRCC EDD shall include any tract of land that is used for
residential purposes, except for hotels, motels, inns, or bed and breakfasts for
temporary occupancy, in any form or fashion, including, without limitation,
private or public homes, residences, housing, dwellings, apartments, studios,
flats, townhomes, condominiums, cooperatives, residential rooms, residential
beds, dormitories, student residences and housing, student apartments,
fraternity houses, sorority houses, student residential quarters or other form or
housing, as of January 24, 2026, individually and collectively "residential
properties". All residential properties are deemed district exclusions. In the
event that the description of the BRCC EDD set forth in Subparagraph (a) of
this Paragraph includes any of the district exclusions, the district exclusion shall
not be considered as a component of the BRCC EDD.
C.(1) The district shall be administered and governed by a board of
commissioners, referred to in this Section as the "board".
(2) The board shall be comprised as follows:
(a) The highest executive officer of the college shall appoint four persons
Page 12 of 19
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 283 ENROLLED
and shall serve as a member of the board and chairman of the board as long as
he is the highest executive officer of the college.
(b) Two of the members of the board shall be representatives from
businesses within the district.
(3) Members shall serve five-year terms after initial terms as provided
by the ordinance creating the district. The president shall serve as long as he is
president of the college. Two members shall serve an initial term of two years,
and two members shall serve an initial term of three years, as determined by lot
at the first meeting of the board. Each member of the board shall continue to
serve until reappointed or a successor is duly appointed. Any vacancy in the
membership of the board shall be filled in the manner of the original
appointment for the unexpired term. If an appointment to fill a vacancy is not
made within sixty days, the board shall appoint an interim successor to serve
until the position is filled by the appointing authority.
(4) Any member of the board may be removed by a three-fourths vote
of the remaining membership of the board for cause, which may include failure
to attend at least one-half of the meetings of the board in a two-year period.
(5) The members of the board shall serve without salary or per diem.
The board may reimburse any member for reasonable, actual, and necessary
expenses incurred in the performance of his duties pursuant to this Section.
(6) The board shall elect from its members a president, a vice president,
a secretary, and a treasurer, whose duties shall be those common to these
offices. At the option of the board, the offices of secretary and treasurer may be
held by one person.
(7) The board shall meet in regular session at least once per year and
shall also meet in special session as often as the president of the board convenes
the board or upon the written request of at least three members. A majority of
the members of the board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of
business. The board shall keep minutes of all meetings and shall make them
available for inspection through the board's secretary or secretary-treasurer,
Page 13 of 19
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 283 ENROLLED
who shall also maintain the minute books and archives of the district. The
monies, funds, and accounts of the district shall be in the official custody of the
board.
(8) The domicile of the board shall be established by the board at a
location within the district. The official journal of the district is the official
journal of the parish where the domicile of the board is located.
D. The district, acting by and through its board, shall have and exercise
all powers of a political subdivision necessary or convenient for the carrying out
of its objects and purposes, including but not limited to the following:
(1) To sue and to be sued.
(2) To adopt, use, and alter at will a corporate seal.
(3) To acquire by gift, grant, or purchase all property, including rights-
of-way, movable, immovable, or mixed, corporeal or incorporeal, or any interest
therein.
(4) To enter into contracts for the purchase, acquisition, construction,
and improvement of works and facilities necessary in connection with the
purposes of the district.
(5) To regulate the imposition of fees and rentals charged by the district
for its facilities and services rendered by it.
(6) To borrow money and pledge all or part of its revenues, leases, rents,
or other advantages as security for the loans.
(7) To appoint officers, agents, and employees; prescribe their duties;
and fix their compensation.
(8) To develop public improvement projects for the benefit of the
respective college, either directly with the respective college or through one or
more private foundations or nonprofit corporations affiliated with the
respective college, or both.
E.(1) The district may create subdistricts as provided in this Subsection.
The district shall publish notice of its intent to create a subdistrict in the official
journal of the district. At least ten days after publication of the notice, the board
Page 14 of 19
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 283 ENROLLED
shall conduct a public hearing on the question of creating the subdistrict.
Thereafter, the board may designate one or more areas within the boundaries
of the district as subdistricts of the district. Each subdistrict shall constitute a
political subdivision of the state and shall be governed by the board. Each
subdistrict shall have the same powers as the district and shall be given a
suitable name as the board may designate. Hereafter in this Section, any
reference to the district includes any subdistrict created by the district.
(2) The boundaries of a district may be changed in accordance with
provisions of this Section dealing with the establishment of the original
boundaries.
F.(1) The district may issue and sell from time to time bonds, notes,
renewal notes, refunding bonds, interim certificates, certificates of indebtedness,
certificates of participation, debentures, warrants, commercial paper, or other
obligations or evidences of indebtedness to provide funds for and to fulfill and
achieve its public purpose or corporate purposes, as set forth in this Section,
including but not limited to the payment of all or a portion of the costs of a
project, to provide amounts necessary for any corporate purposes, including
necessary and incidental expenses in connection with the issuance of the
obligations, the payment of principal and interest on the obligations of the
district, the establishment of reserves to secure the obligations, and all other
purposes and expenditures of the district incident to and necessary or
convenient to carry out its public functions or corporate purposes, and any
credit enhancement for the obligations.
(2) Except as may otherwise be provided by the board, all obligations
issued by the district shall be negotiable instruments and payable solely from
the revenues of the district as determined by the board, or from any other
source that may be available to the district but shall not be secured by the full
faith and credit of the state or the local governmental subdivision.
(3) Obligations shall be authorized, issued, and sold by a resolution or
resolutions of the board. The bonds or obligations may be of the series; bear the
Page 15 of 19
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 283 ENROLLED
date or dates; mature at the time or times; bear interest at the rate or rates,
including variable, adjustable, or zero interest rates; be payable at the time or
times; be in the denominations; be sold at the price or prices, at public or
private negotiated sale, after advertisement as is provided for in R.S. 39:1426;
be in the form; carry the registration and exchangeability privileges; be payable
at the place or places; be subject to the terms of redemption; and be entitled to
the priorities on the income, revenue, and receipts of, or available to, the district
as may be provided by the board in the resolution or resolutions providing for
the issuance and sale of the bonds or obligations of the district.
(4) The obligations of the district shall be signed by the officers of the
board by either manual or facsimile signatures as shall be determined by
resolution or resolutions of the board and may have impressed or imprinted
thereon the seal of the district or a facsimile thereof.
(5) Any obligations of the district may be validly issued, sold, and
delivered, notwithstanding that one or more of the officers of the board signing
the obligations, or whose facsimile signature or signatures may be on the
obligations, shall have ceased to be the officer of the board at the time the
obligations shall actually have been delivered.
(6) Obligations of the district may be sold in the manner and from time
to time as may be determined by the board to be most beneficial, subject to
approval of the State Bond Commission, and the district may pay all expenses,
premiums, fees, or commissions which it may deem necessary or advantageous
in connection with the issuance and sale thereof.
(7) The board may authorize the establishment of a fund or funds for the
creation of a debt service reserve, a renewal and replacement reserve, or other
funds or reserves as the board may approve with respect to the financing and
operation of any project funded with the proceeds of the bonds and as may be
authorized by any bond resolution, trust agreement, indenture of trust, or
similar instrument or agreement pursuant to the provisions of which the
issuance of bonds or other obligations of the district or subdistrict may be
Page 16 of 19
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 283 ENROLLED
authorized.
(8) Any cost, obligation, or expense incurred for any of the purposes or
powers of the district specified in this Subsection shall be a part of the project
costs and may be paid or reimbursed as such out of the proceeds of bonds or
other obligations issued by the district; however, no portion of any state sales
taxes made directly available to the district pursuant to an agreement with the
state shall be used by the district to pay the costs of constructing or operating
any privately owned hotel located within the district without the consent of the
Joint Legislative Committee on the Budget or its successor.
(9) For a period of thirty days from the date of publication of the
resolution authorizing the issuance of bonds hereunder, any persons in interest
shall have the right to contest the legality of the resolution and the legality of the
bond issue for any cause, after which time no one shall have any cause or right
of action to contest the legality of the resolution or of the bonds authorized
thereby for any cause whatsoever. If no suit, action, or proceeding is begun
contesting the validity of the bond issue within thirty days, the authority to issue
the bonds and to provide for the payment thereof and the legality thereof and
all of the provisions of the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds, shall
be conclusively presumed, and no court shall have authority to inquire into the
matters.
(10) Neither the members of the board nor any person executing the
bonds shall be personally liable for the bonds or be subject to any personal
liability by reason of the issuance thereof. No earnings or assets of the district
shall accrue to the benefit of any private persons. However, the limitation of
liability provided for in this Paragraph shall not apply to any gross negligence
or criminal negligence on the part of any member of the board or person
executing the bonds.
(11) All obligations authorized to be issued by the district pursuant to the
provisions of this Subsection, together with interest thereof, income therefrom,
and gain upon the sale thereof shall be exempt from all state and local taxes.
Page 17 of 19
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 283 ENROLLED
(12) The state and all public officers; any parish, municipality, or other
subdivision or instrumentality of the state; any political subdivision; any bank,
banker, trust company, savings bank and institution, building and loan
association, savings and loan association, investment company, or any person
carrying on a banking or investment business, any insurance company or
business, insurance association, and any person carrying on an insurance
business; and any executor, administrator, curator, trustee, and other fiduciary;
and any retirement system or pension fund may legally invest any sinking funds
monies; or other funds belonging to them or within their control in any bonds
or other obligations issued by the district pursuant to the provisions of this
Subsection, and the bonds or other obligations shall be authorized security for
all public deposits. It is the purpose of this Section to authorize the persons,
firms, corporations, associations, political subdivisions and officers, or other
entities, public or private, to use any funds owned or controlled by them,
including but not limited to sinking, insurance, investment, retirement,
compensation, pension, and trust funds, and funds held on deposit, for the
purchase of any bonds or other obligations of the district or subdistrict, and
that the bonds shall be authorized security for all public deposits. However,
nothing contained in this Section with regard to legal investments or security for
public deposits shall be construed as relieving any person, firm, corporation, or
other entity from any duty of exercising reasonable care in selecting securities.
G. The district shall dissolve and cease to exist upon the later to occur of
either one year after the date on which all loans, bonds, notes, and other
evidences of indebtedness of the district, including refunding bonds, are paid in
full as to both principal and interest or fifty years from the creation of the
district.
H. This Section, being necessary for the welfare of the state, the parish,
and its residents, shall be liberally construed to effect the purposes thereof.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
Page 18 of 19
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 283 ENROLLED
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 19 of 19
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.